Hawaii statutes.
[§201H-126] Benefits of program not
exclusive. Nothing in this subpart shall be construed to prohibit, with
respect to an eligible project, the operation of the rental assistance program
in conjunction with other state or federal programs including the state rent
supplements provided for in part VIII of chapter 356D. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next